Utah statutes.
62A-1-115.   Actions on behalf of department -- Party in interest.

The executive director, each of the department's boards, divisions, offices, and the director of each division or office, shall, in the exercise of any power, duty, or function under any statute of this state, is considered to be acting on behalf of the department.  The department, through the executive director or through any of the department's boards, divisions, offices, or directors, shall be considered the party in interest in all actions at law or in equity, where the department or any constituent, board, division, office, or official thereof is authorized by any statute of the state to be a party to any legal action.

